District of Columbia statutes.
7-1403

Liabilities of the Public Benefit Corporation.

All liabilities of the Public Benefit Corporation shall be assumed by the District of Columbia.

July 12, 2001, D.C. Law 14-18, § 5, 48 DCR 4047
This section is referenced in § 7-1401.